Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1928
Appeal; mistake of clerk; effect; procedure.

A mistake, neglect or omission of the clerk shall not be a ground of error, until the same has been presented and acted upon in the court in which the mistake, neglect or omission occurred.

R.S.1867, Code § 597, p. 500;

R.S.1913, § 8201;

C.S.1922, § 9153;

C.S.1929, § 20-1928;

R.S.1943, § 25-1928.

Clerk's mistake, neglect, or omission in entering judgment on verdict is not ground of error until presented and acted upon in court in which it occurred. Crete Mills v. Stevens, 120 Neb. 794, 235 N.W. 453 (1931).

Section applied to error in inserting erroneous answer day in summons in county court. Ley v. Pilger, 59 Neb. 561, 81 N.W. 507 (1900).